Massachusetts, session 194th, H3349.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16 of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
The executive office of health and human services shall include: (1) the department of
elder affairs under the direction of a secretary of elder affairs, who shall be appointed by the
governor; (2) the office of health services, which shall include the department of public health,
the department of mental health, the division of medical assistance and the Betsy Lehman center
for patient safety and medical error reduction; (3) the office of children, youth and family
services, which shall include the department of children and families, the department of
of 3

transitional assistance, the department of youth services, the child abuse prevention board and
the office for refugees and immigrants; (4) the department of correction, including the parole
board; (5) the office of disabilities and community services, which shall include the department
of developmental services, the Massachusetts rehabilitation commission, the Massachusetts
commission for the blind and the Massachusetts commission for the deaf and hard of hearing; (6)
the managed care oversight board; (7) the health facilities appeals board; and () the office of
health equity.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 6A, as so appearing is hereby further amended by striking out
section 18 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 18. The following state agencies are hereby declared to be within the executive
office of public safety and security: the department of fire services; the office of grants and
research and the highway safety division; the municipal police training committee; the
Massachusetts department of criminal justice information services; the state 911 department; the
department of state police; the office of the chief medical examiner; the Massachusetts
emergency management agency; the military department; the sex offender registry board; and all
other agencies and boards within said departments, committees and boards.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 27 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 10, the words "public safety" and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- health and human services.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of said chapter 27, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
out, in line 2, the words "public safety" and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
health and human services.
of 3

SECTION 5. Section 4 of said chapter 27, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
out, in line 20, the words "public safety" and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
health and human services.
SECTION 6. Section 7 of said chapter 27, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
out, in line 4, the words "public safety" and inserting in place thereof the words:- health and
human services.
of 3